Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1278.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 49, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 49-119, to read: START_STATUTE49-119. Solar radiation management; prohibition; enforcement; definition A. Notwithstanding any other law, a person may not intentionally inject, release or dispense or cause the injection, release or dispensation of any material within the borders of this state for solar radiation management. B. A political subdivision of this state, including any public university or any private entity that receives public monies, may not provide any grants for the development of solar radiation management technologies. C. Any resident of this state may submit a complaint to the attorney general alleging a violation of this section. Complaints must state the following: 1. The name and contact information of the resident who submits the complaint. 2. The date or dates the alleged violation occurred. 3. A description of the alleged violation and the location, method and substances or compounds used, if known. 4. Any applicable supporting evidence or documentation. D. The attorney general shall investigate all credible complaints submitted to the department of law pursuant to this section. E. The attorney general may investigate any conduct that the attorney general has reasonable suspicion to believe violates this section. F. The attorney general may file an action in the superior court alleging a violation of this section. If the court finds a violation, the superior court shall award injunctive relief and reasonable attorney fees to the prevailing party. The superior court may award other relief as the court finds necessary. G. For the purposes of this section, "solar radiation management" means the modification or attempted modification of atmospheric reflectivity that modifies the amount or intensity of sunlight that reaches the earth. END_STATUTE